el: Έπιπλα > Καρέκλες > Καρέκλες Bean Bag: Πουφ-ξαπλώστρες και ανάκλιντρα; Παιδικά πουφ; Πουφ εξωτερικού χώρου
hr-HR: Namještaj > Stolice > Vreće za sjedenje: Ležaljke i dnevni kreveti vreće za sjedenje; Dječje vreće za sjedenje; Vanjske vreće za sjedenje
de: Möbel > Stühle > Sitzsäcke: Sitzsack-Liegen & Daybeds; Kinder-Sitzsäcke; Outdoor-Sitzsäcke
ro-RO: Mobilier > Scaune > Scaune tip Bean Bag: Șezlonguri și canapele tip puf; Fotolii tip puf pentru copii; Fotolii tip puf pentru exterior
hu: Bútor > Székek > Babzsák-székek: Babzsákfotelek és -heverők; Gyerek babzsákfotelek; Kültéri babzsákfotelek
zh-TW: 家具 > 椅子 > 懶骨頭/豆袋椅: 懶骨頭躺椅與沙發床; 兒童懶骨頭椅; 戶外懶骨頭椅
en: Furniture > Chairs > Bean Bag Chairs: Bean Bag Loungers & Daybeds; Kids' Bean Bag Chairs; Outdoor Bean Bag Chairs
pl: Meble > Krzesła i fotele > Worki do siedzenia: Pufy-worki i szezlongi sako; Dziecięce pufy-worki; Zewnętrzne pufy-worki
it: Arredamento > Sedie > Poltrone a sacco: Poltrone a sacco e dormeuse; Poltrone a sacco per bambini; Poltrone a sacco da esterno
ru: Мебель > Кресла и стулья > Кресла-мешки: Шезлонги и лежаки-мешки; Детские кресла-мешки; Уличные кресла-мешки
ko: 가구 > 의자 > 빈 백 의자: 빈백 라운저 및 데이베드; 아동용 빈백 의자; 야외용 빈백 의자
ja: 家具 > 椅子 > ビーンバッグ: ビーズクッションラウンジャー・デイベッド; キッズ用ビーズクッション; アウトドア用ビーズクッション
zh-CN: 家具 > 椅子 > 豆袋椅/懒人沙发: 豆袋躺椅和沙发床; 儿童豆袋椅; 户外豆袋椅
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Stoli > Vreče za sedenje: Ležalniki in dnevne postelje v obliki vreče s stiropornimi kroglicami; Otroške vreče za sedenje; Zunanje vreče za sedenje
es: Mobiliario > Sillas > Pufs: Tumbonas y sofás cama puff; Puffs infantiles; Puffs para exteriores
bg-BG: Мебели > Столове > Столове тип „барбарони“: Шезлонги и кушетки тип „барбарон“; Детски фотьойли тип „барбарон“; Градински фотьойли тип „барбарон“
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เก้าอี้ > เก้าอี้เม็ดโฟม: เบาะบีนแบคแบบยาวและเดย์เบด; เก้าอี้บีนแบคเด็ก; เก้าอี้บีนแบคกลางแจ้ง
nb: Møbler > Stoler > Sakkosekker: Sekkestoler og dagsenger; Sekkestoler for barn; Sekkestoler til utendørsbruk
da: Møbler > Stole > Sækkestole: Sækkestole og daybeds; Sækkestole til børn; Udendørs sækkestole
pt-BR: Móveis > Cadeiras > Pufes redondos: Pufes espreguiçadeiras e divãs; Pufes infantis; Pufes para área externa
sv: Möbler > Stolar > Sittsäckar: Sittsäcksfåtöljer & dagbäddar; Sittsäckar för barn; Sittsäckar för utomhusbruk
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Cadeiras > Pufes: Espreguiçadeiras e pufes tipo chaise longue; Pufes para crianças; Pufes de exterior
sk-SK: Nábytok > Stoličky > Sedacie vaky: Lehátka a denné postele so sedacími vakmi; Detské sedacie vaky; Vonkajšie sedacie vaky
nl: Meubelen > Stoelen > Zitzakken: Zitzakloungers en -ligbedden; Kinderzitzakken; Zitzakken voor buiten
vi: Đồ gỗ > Ghế > Ghế túi: Ghế lười hạt xốp dạng nằm & daybed; Ghế lười hạt xốp cho trẻ em; Ghế lười hạt xốp ngoài trời
fi: Huonekalut > Tuolit > Säkkituolit: Säkkituolit ja -sohvat; Lasten säkkituolit; Ulkokäyttöön sopivat säkkituolit
lt-LT: Baldai > Kėdės > Sėdmaišiai: Sėdmaišių gultai ir ir kušetės; Vaikiški sėdmaišiai; Lauko sėdmaišiai
tr: Mobilyalar > Sandalyeler > Armut Koltuklar: Armut koltuklar ve uzanma yatakları; Çocuk armut koltukları; Dış mekan armut koltukları
fr: Meubles > Chaises > Poufs poires: Poufs chaises longues et méridiennes; Poufs poires pour enfants; Poufs poires d’extérieur
cs: Nábytek > Židle > Sedací vaky a pytle: Sedací pytle a lenošky; Dětské sedací vaky; Venkovní sedací vaky